Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-15,104.01
Council; designated as rate-review agency.

For purposes of section (c) of Article III of the Central Interstate Low-Level Radioactive Waste Compact, the council is hereby designated as the rate-review agency for this state.

Laws 1983, LB 200, § 3;

R.S.1943, (1989), Appendix (BB);

Laws 1991, LB 716, § 2.

Central Interstate Low-Level Radioactive Waste Compact, see section 71-3522.